District of Columbia statutes.
22-3009

Second degree child sexual abuse.

Whoever, being at least 4 years older than a child, engages in sexual contact with that child or causes that child to engage in sexual contact shall be imprisoned for not more than 10 years and, in addition, may be fined in an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 208, 42 DCR 53
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 232(g), 60 DCR 2064
Sentencing, supervised release, and good time credit for felonies committed on or after August 5, 2000, see § 24-403.01.
This section is referenced in § 23-113 and § 24-112.
1981 Ed., § 22-4109.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “in an amount not to exceed $100,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 232(g) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.